local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
    <pardef n="australier__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ros__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ornas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ors</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aktie__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rnas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rs</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="officer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grep__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ars</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kaviar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="koppar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bris__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alstring__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="kungörelse"><i>kungörelse</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aktie"><i>aktie</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ammunition"><i>ammunition</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="australier"><i>australier</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bark"><i>bark</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bastu"><i>bastu</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="belgier"><i>belgier</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bensin"><i>bensin</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="besvikelse"><i>besvikelse</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="betong"><i>betong</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="betydelse"><i>betydelse</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bondhustru"><i>bondhustru</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bris"><i>bris</i><par n="bris__n"/></e>
    <e lm="censur"><i>censur</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centimeter"><i>centimeter</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="choklad"><i>choklad</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dynamit"><i>dynamit</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ebb"><i>ebb</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fattigdom"><i>fattigdom</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiendskap"><i>fiendskap</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frost"><i>frost</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fysik"><i>fysik</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grep"><i>grep</i><par n="grep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gymnastik"><i>gymnastik</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="honung"><i>honung</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hotelse"><i>hotelse</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaviar"><i>kaviar</i><par n="kaviar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kilometer"><i>kilometer</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klor"><i>klor</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ko"><i>ko</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolik"><i>kolik</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kommissarie"><i>kommissarie</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kondition"><i>kondition</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koppar"><i>koppar</i><par n="koppar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kristendom"><i>kristendom</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kritik"><i>kritik</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kritiker"><i>kritiker</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvadratmeter"><i>kvadratmeter</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="linje"><i>linje</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liter"><i>liter</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="majs"><i>majs</i><par n="bris__n"/></e>
    <e lm="matematik"><i>matematik</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="musik"><i>musik</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="musiker"><i>musiker</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nervositet"><i>nervositet</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nord"><i>nord</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oenighet"><i>oenighet</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="officer"><i>officer</i><par n="officer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="optiker"><i>optiker</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="order"><i>order</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ork"><i>ork</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panik"><i>panik</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pepparrot"><i>pepparrot</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="politik"><i>politik</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="psykiatriker"><i>psykiatriker</i><par n="australier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pudding"><i>pudding</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radio"><i>radio</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ros"><i>ros</i><par n="ros__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saknad"><i>saknad</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sambo"><i>sambo</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senap"><i>senap</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serie"><i>serie</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sko"><i>sko</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smuts"><i>smuts</i><par n="bris__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sold"><i>sold</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stadsbo"><i>stadsbo</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stolthet"><i>stolthet</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tillit"><i>tillit</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trafik"><i>trafik</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yoghurt"><i>yoghurt</i><par n="alstring__n"/></e>
